Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB299.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 186 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "state police" means the Department of Kentucky State
Police.
(2) (a) From September 1, 2027, until June 30, 2029, the state police shall operate
a pilot project in partnership with the Kentucky Department of Education to
provide instruction permit testing in one (1) public high school in each
congressional district of the Commonwealth.
(b) In a congressional district that encompasses more than one (1) county, the
state police shall operate the pilot project in a county within the
congressional district in which the state police do not provide permanent,
full-time, instruction permit testing.
(3) In operating the pilot project under this section, the state police shall:
(a) With the assistance of the Kentucky Department of Education, identify
potential high schools to participate in the pilot project based on both public
demand and available state police resources;
(b) Enter into agreements with a local board of education to conduct the pilot
project;
(c) Administer testing at the selected high schools at least one (1) time per
school year;
(d) Accept applications for testing slots through the state police's online
application portal;
(e) Limit testing to only residents of the county where the test will be
administered; and
(f) Limit testing to only applicants for an instruction permit under KRS
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/24/2026 12:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1300
186.450.
(4) A school participating in the pilot project shall:
(a) Have the approval of the local school board to participate in the pilot
project;
(b) Designate one (1) employee to serve as the coordinator of the pilot project at
the high school who will set up the event and organize students to attend the
event with the proper documentation;
(c) Provide internet connections and a location on the high school campus for
the event; and
(d) Ensure participating county residents have access to the testing site.
(5) The state police shall collect data on testing administered under this section and,
by October 31, 2027, and annually thereafter for as long as the pilot project
continues, submit a report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to
the Interim Joint Committee on Transportation providing:
(a) Data regarding the number of available testing appointments, applicants
served, unclaimed testing slots, and no-show appointments; and
(b) Information regarding how the pilot project affected testing associated with
regional licensing offices.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/24/2026 12:52 PM Jacketed